Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-217
Labor organizations; membership or nonmembership; prohibited acts.

To make operative the provisions of sections 13, 14 and 15 of Article XV of the Constitution of Nebraska, no person shall be denied employment because of membership in or affiliation with, or resignation or expulsion from a labor organization or because of refusal to join, affiliate with, or pay a fee either directly or indirectly to a labor organization; nor shall any individual or corporation or association of any kind enter into any contract, written or oral, to exclude persons from employment because of membership in or nonmembership in a labor organization.

Laws 1947, c. 177, § 1, p. 585;

Laws 1961, c. 236, § 1, p. 699.

Right to work was a right guaranteed by both state and federal Constitutions. Hanson v. Union Pacific R.R. Co., 160 Neb. 669, 71 N.W.2d 526 (1955).

Provisions of federal Railway Labor Act superseded and were controlling over requirements of this section. Railway Employees Department, American Federation of Labor v. Hanson, 351 U.S. 225 (1956).

Public policy that employment not be denied on basis of union membership includes public as well as private employment. American Federation of State, Co., & Mun. Emp. v. Woodward, 406 F.2d 137 (8th Cir. 1969).